Missouri, session 2026, HB3288.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 209, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 209.247, to read as follows:
209.247. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri commission for the deaf and hard of hearing;
(2) "Communication access service", shall include, but not be limited to, the
following:
(a) Qualified interpreters, as described in section 209.285;
(b) Communication access real-time translation services;
(c) Notetakers, visual or Braille boards, and visual video services;
(d) Open and closed captioning services;
(e) Environmental access support for the deaf-blind and those with low vision;
and
(f) Any other effective method of making aurally delivered and printed
information available to individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind, or hard of hearing;
(3) "Communication access service provider", an individual who is trained to
offer a communication access service to communicate aurally delivered and printed
information to individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind, or hard of hearing.
2. The commission shall establish a statewide communication access services
program to improve compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act for
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3288 2
agencies and businesses by coordinating resources, filling service gaps, and assisting
with costs related to accommodations. The commission shall:
(1) Develop and maintain a statewide registry of communication access service
providers, organized by region, including rural and urban areas;
(2) Create a process for communication access service providers to apply for
placement on the registry;
(3) Establish minimum standards for training, equipment, and technology;
(4) Maintain an informational website accessible by businesses, agencies, and
individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind, or hard of hearing regarding resources and
available programming;
(5) Provide consultation, training, and technical assistance to aid state and local
agencies to be in compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act;
(6) Provide information regarding available resources to assist with compliance
costs and to support potential communication access service providers in underserved
areas;
(7) Conduct outreach activities for urban or rural residents and communication
access service providers to expand awareness and capacity in underserved areas;
(8) Subject to appropriation, administer scholarships for professional
development, internships, and certification testing;
(9) Subject to appropriation and pursuant to rules promulgated under this
section, administer and finance requests for communication access services between
agencies and businesses and individuals who are deaf, deaf-blind, or hard of hearing;
(10) Hire a program manager to serve at the pleasure of the director of the
commission. The program manager shall have a background and experience in
communication access services. The salary for the program manager shall be paid out
of the fund established in subsection 3 of this section; and
(11) Submit an annual report to the governor and the general assembly that
includes information on communication access service utilization, registry effectiveness,
funding outcomes, and recommendations for improvement.
3. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Communication Access
Services Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated to the fund and any gifts,
donations, grants, and bequests from individuals, private organizations, foundations, or
other sources for the purpose of administering the program established in this section.
The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in the fund shall be used by the

HB 3288 3
commission for the salary of the program manager, distribution of financial assistance
for communication access services, and distribution of scholarships under this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
4. The commission shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
section, including the process for distributing scholarships under subdivision (8) of
subsection 2 of this section and determining eligibility for financial assistance under
subdivision (9) of subsection 2 of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term
is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section
shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔